District of Columbia statutes.
34-2407.03

Remedies not exclusive.

The remedies set forth in §§ 34-2407.01, 34-2407.02, and 34-2413.10 [repealed] are hereby declared to be cumulative and not exclusive.

History

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 102, ch. 218, title I, § 105

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2110.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1530.
1973 Ed., § 43-1521d.